Utah statutes.
73-10e-2.   Requirement to obtain rights-of-way and easements.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the money appropriated into the Water
Development and Flood Mitigation Reserve Account in Section 73-10e-1 may not
be spent for construction of dikes until all necessary rights-of-way and
easements are obtained for each individual diking project by the impacted
local government entities in which the diking projects are located.
